Idaho, session 2025, H0470.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 35, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-3520, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-3520. IDAHO PERSONNEL REDUCTION ACT. (1) It is the intent of the
legislature that the Idaho state government performs its duties and serves
the public interest as well and efficiently as practicable. Discovering and
eliminating government waste will save taxpayer dollars while increasing
public confidence in the responsibility and integrity of Idaho state govern-
ment.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Department" means a department, agency, institution, or office of
the state of Idaho that receives a legislative appropriation for per-
sonnel costs.
(b) "FTP" means full-time equivalent positions.
(3) On or before September 1, 2025, and annually on or before each
September 1 thereafter, every department shall identify the number of cur-
rently vacant appropriated FTP, including portions of FTP, within such
department that were vacant for more than one (1) calendar year as of the date
of the budget submission pursuant to section 67-3502, Idaho Code.
(4) Vacant FTP identified in subsection (3) of this section and their
associated salaries and fringe benefits may be eliminated by the legisla-
ture. A department may request to retain the identified FTP if funds are
available within the department's existing appropriation for personnel
costs and shall fill the vacancy as soon as practicable.
(5) The number of FTP identified in subsection (3) of this section shall
be detailed in the department's annual budget submission required pursuant
to section 67-3502, Idaho Code, together with the following information:
(a) Each individual vacant FTP or portion of FTP by job title;
(b) The length of time the position has been vacant;
(c) The job description associated with the position;
(d) Whether there is funding available to fill the FTP and, if so, the
source of such funds;
(e) The reason why the FTP remains vacant; and


(f) Whether the department has reduced the FTP from its budget submis-
sion or is requesting that the FTP be retained.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 35, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-3520A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-3520A. REPORTING OF IDAHO STATE EMPLOYEE TRAVEL EXPENSES. (1) Con-
sistent with the legislative intent provided for in section 67-3520, Idaho
Code, it is also the intent of the legislature to discover and eliminate gov-
ernment waste involving state employee travel in order to save taxpayer dol-
lars while increasing public confidence in the responsibility and integrity
of Idaho state government.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Department" means a department, agency, institution, or office of
the state of Idaho that receives a legislative appropriation for per-
sonnel costs.
(b) "Travel expenses" means costs associated with reimbursement of
travel or subsistence pursuant to the standard travel pay and allowance
act of 1949, chapter 20, title 67, Idaho Code.
(3) All travel expenses from the preceding fiscal year shall be de-
tailed in the department's annual budget submission required pursuant to
section 67-3502, Idaho Code, including detail regarding the following in-
formation:
(a) Total travel expenses of the department;
(b) Identification of all travel occurrences and the purposes of such
travel;
(c) Travel destinations;
(d) Airfare, mileage, car rental, lodging, food, conference fees, and
other expenses;
(e) Dates of travel; and
(f) Portions of any travel expenses that were paid by an entity other
than the state of Idaho.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.